src/propernoun-sma-morph.txt
LEXICON INAME_ODD-plc
+N+Prop+Plc: INAME_ODD_PLC-ORG ;


LEXICON INAME_ODD-sur
+N+Prop+Sur: INAME_ODD ;

LEXICON INAME_ODD-mal
+N+Prop+Mal: INAME_ODD ;

LEXICON INAME_ODD-fem
+N+Prop+Fem: INAME_ODD ;


 LEXICON INAME_ODD ! Names ending in stressless vowel
  +Sg+Nom:%>i         FINAL1 ;
  :%>i         RHyph ;
 +Sg: INAME_ODD_SG ; ! name special
 +Pl: N_ODD_PL ;     ! normal noun
 :    N_ODD_ESS ;    ! normal noun
 +Attr:%>i FINAL1 ;     ! name special
 
 LEXICON INAME_ODD_PLC-ORG ! Names ending in stressless vowel
  +Sg+Nom:%>i         FINAL1 ;
  :%>i         RHyph ;
 +Sg: INAME_ODD_SG ; ! name special
! +Pl: N_ODD_PL ;     ! normal noun
 :    N_ODD_ESS ;    ! normal noun
 +Attr:%>i FINAL1 ;     ! name special

  
  LEXICON INAME_ODD_SG
  +Acc:e%>%^DISIMPm      FINAL1 ;
  +Gen:e%>%^DISIMPn      FINAL1 ;
 +Ill:%>asse            FINAL1 ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
  +Ine:%>isnie           FINAL1 ;
  +Ela:%>istie           FINAL1 ;
  +Com:%>inie            FINAL1 ;


LEXICON PERS_SNAME_ODD-mal
+N+Prop+Mal: PERS_SNAME_ODD ;

LEXICON PERS_SNAME_ODD-fem
+N+Prop+Fem: PERS_SNAME_ODD ;

LEXICON PERS_SNAME_ODD-ani
+N+Prop+Ani: PERS_SNAME_ODD ;

LEXICON PERS_SNAME_ODD
 VNAME_ODD ;
+Der1+Der/Dimin+N:e%»tj   GÅATETJE ; !Åvletje


LEXICON SNAME_ODD-plc
+N+Prop+Plc: SNAME_ODD_PLC-ORG ;


LEXICON SNAME_ODD-org
+N+Prop+Org: SNAME_ODD_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON SNAME_ODD-ani
+N+Prop+Ani: SNAME_ODD ;


LEXICON SNAME_ODD-mal
+N+Prop+Mal: SNAME_ODD ;

!LEXICON SNAME_ODD-fem
!+N+Prop+Fem: SNAME_ODD ;

LEXICON SNAME_ODD ! Southern Sami names
VNAME_ODD ;

LEXICON SNAME_ODD_PLC-ORG ! Southern Sami names
VNAME_ODD_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON VAARATJE-plc
VAARATJE ;

LEXICON VAARATJE !names vowel expansion in all cases
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Nom:e         FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Plc:e         RHyph ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Acc:e%>m      FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen:e%>n      FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Ill:%>asse            FINAL1 ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Ine:%>isnie           FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Ela:%>istie           FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Com:%>inie            FINAL1 ;
! +N+Prop+Plc+Pl+Nom:%>h       FINAL1 ;
! +N+Prop+Plc+Pl+Acc:%>idie            FINAL1 ;
! +N+Prop+Plc+Pl+Gen:%>i       FINAL1 ;
! +N+Prop+Plc+Pl+Ill:%>idie            FINAL1 ;
! +N+Prop+Plc+Pl+Ine:%>inie            FINAL1 ;
! +N+Prop+Plc+Pl+Ela:%>ijstie          FINAL1 ;
! +N+Prop+Plc+Pl+Com:%>igujmie FINAL1 ;
! +N+Prop+Plc+Ess:%>inie          FINAL1 ;
! +N+Prop+Plc+Attr:e FINAL1 ;

LEXICON JALKEDSEN ! Names ending in stressless vowel
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Nom:e%^DISIMPn         FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Plc:e%^DISIMPn         RHyph ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Acc:e%>%^DISIMPm      FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen:e%>%^DISIMPn      FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Ill:%>asse            FINAL1 ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Ine:%>isnie           FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Ela:%>istie           FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Com:%>inie            FINAL1 ;
!+N+Prop+Plc+Pl: N_ODD_PL ;
+N+Prop+Plc:    N_ODD_ESS ;
+N+Prop+Plc+Attr:e%^DISIMPn FINAL1 ;



LEXICON SNAME_ODD_PLUR ! Southern Sami names
+N+Prop+Plc+Pl: N_ODD_PL ;
+N+Prop+Plc:%>%^DISIMPi       RHyph ;
+N+Prop+Plc:    N_ODD_ESS ;
!+N+Prop+Plc+Attr:%>%^DISIMPh FINAL1 ;


LEXICON JAAVRETJEH
  +N+Prop+Plc:%>%^DISIMPe       RHyph ;
  +N+Prop+Plc+Pl+Nom:%>%^DISIMPeh       FINAL1 ;
  +N+Prop+Plc+Pl+Acc:%>idie            FINAL1 ;
  +N+Prop+Plc+Pl+Gen:%>%^DISIMPi       FINAL1 ;
  +N+Prop+Plc:%>%^DISIMPi       RHyph ;
  +N+Prop+Plc+Pl+Ill:%>idie            FINAL1 ;
  +N+Prop+Plc+Pl+Ine:%>inie            FINAL1 ;
  +N+Prop+Plc+Pl+Ela:%>ijstie          FINAL1 ;
  +N+Prop+Plc+Pl+Com:%>%^DISIMPigujmie FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Pl+Com+Use/Sub:%>%^DISIMPigyjmie FINAL1 ; !
  +N+Prop+Plc:    N_ODD_ESS ;
!+N+Prop+Plc+Attr:e%>%^DISIMPh FINAL1 ;


LEXICON RITCHIE-plc
+N+Prop+Plc: RITCHIE_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON RITCHIE-sur
+N+Prop+Sur: RITCHIE ;


LEXICON RITCHIE-mal
+N+Prop+Mal: RITCHIE ;

LEXICON RITCHIE-fem
+N+Prop+Fem: RITCHIE ;


LEXICON RITCHIE ! Ritchie:Ritchijasse
+Sg+Nom:e%^DISIMP          FINAL1 ;
:e%^DISIMP          RHyph ;
+Sg+Acc:je%>%^DISIMPm      FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Gen:je%>%^DISIMPn      FINAL1 ;
 +Sg+Ill:j%>asse            FINAL1 ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
+Sg+Ine:j%>isnie           FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Ela:j%>istie           FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Com:j%>inie            FINAL1 ;
+Pl:j N_ODD_PL ;
:j    N_ODD_ESS ;
+Attr:e%^DISIMP FINAL1 ;

LEXICON RITCHIE_PLC-ORG ! Ritchie:Ritchijasse
+Sg+Nom:e%^DISIMP          FINAL1 ;
:e%^DISIMP          RHyph ;
+Sg+Acc:je%>%^DISIMPm      FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Gen:je%>%^DISIMPn      FINAL1 ;
 +Sg+Ill:j%>asse            FINAL1 ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
+Sg+Ine:j%>isnie           FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Ela:j%>istie           FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Com:j%>inie            FINAL1 ;
!+Pl:j N_ODD_PL ;
:j    N_ODD_ESS ;
+Attr:e%^DISIMP FINAL1 ;


LEXICON PN_IE-plc
+N+Prop+Plc: PN_IE_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON PN_IE-sur
+N+Prop+Sur: PN_IE ;

LEXICON PN_IE-org
+N+Prop+Org: PN_IE_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON PN_IE-ani
+N+Prop+Ani: PN_IE ;


! Even syllable Sámi names:
LEXICON PN_IE ! as N_IE, but with Prop tag
+Sg: N_IE_SG ;
:ie                  RHyph ;
+Pl: N_IE_PL ;
:    N_IE_ESS ;
+Attr:ie FINAL1 ;

LEXICON PN_IE_PLC-ORG ! as N_IE, but with Prop tag
+Sg: N_IE_SG ;
:ie                  RHyph ;
!+Pl: N_IE_PL ;
:    N_IE_ESS ;
+Attr:ie FINAL1 ;


LEXICON MEHKIEN ! as N_IE, but with Prop tag
+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Nom:ie%>n               FINAL1 ;
+N+Prop+Plc:ie%>n               RHyph ;
+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Acc:ie%>m               FINAL1 ;
+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen:ie%>n               FINAL1 ;
! +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Ill:%>an                FINAL1 ; !SUB - is this possible? IllSg without Uml in -ie?
+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Ill+Uml:%>%^1UMLan      FINAL1 ;
+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Ine:e%>sne              FINAL1 ;
+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Ela:e%>ste              FINAL1 ;
+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Com:%>ine               FINAL1 ;
+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Com+Uml:%>%^iUMLine     FINAL1 ;
!+N+Prop+Plc+Pl: N_IE_PL ;
+N+Prop+Plc:    N_IE_ESS ;
+N+Prop+Plc+Attr:ie%>n FINAL1 ;


! Even syllable Sámi names:
LEXICON PN_IE_PLUR ! as N_IE, but with Prop tag
+N+Prop+Plc+Pl: N_IE_PL ;
+N+Prop+Plc:ie%>j               RHyph ;
+N+Prop+Plc+Uml+Use/NG:%>%^iUMLi       RHyph ;
+N+Prop+Plc:    N_IE_ESS ;
!+N+Prop+Plc+Attr:ie%>h FINAL1 ;


! LEXICON PN_OE_UML ! as N_OE_UML, but with Prop tag ! (still) not in use
!  +N+Prop+Plc: N_OE_SGILL_UML_PLC-ORG ;
!           PN_OE ;

LEXICON PN_OE-plc
+N+Prop+Plc: PN_OE_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON PN_OE-mal
+N+Prop+Mal: PN_OE ;

LEXICON PN_OE ! as N_OE, but with Prop tag
+Sg: N_OE_SG ;
:oe          RHyph ;
+Pl: N_OE_PL ;
 N_OE_ESS ;
+Attr:oe FINAL1 ;

LEXICON PN_OE_PLC-ORG ! as N_OE, but with Prop tag
+Sg: N_OE_SG ;
:oe          RHyph ;
!+Pl: N_OE_PL ;
 N_OE_ESS ;
+Attr:oe FINAL1 ;

LEXICON PERS_SNAME_MAANA-fem
+N+Prop+Fem: PERS_SNAME_MAANA ;

LEXICON PERS_SNAME_MAANA-mal
+N+Prop+Mal: PERS_SNAME_MAANA ;

LEXICON PERS_SNAME_MAANA-ani
+N+Prop+Ani: PERS_SNAME_MAANA ;


LEXICON PERS_SNAME_MAANA
SNAME_MAANA ;
+Der1+Der/Dimin+N:e%»tj   GÅATETJE ; !Åvletje

LEXICON SNAME_MAANA-fem
+N+Prop+Fem: SNAME_MAANA ;

LEXICON SNAME_MAANA-sur
+N+Prop+Sur: SNAME_MAANA ;

LEXICON SNAME_MAANA-mal
+N+Prop+Mal: SNAME_MAANA ;

LEXICON SNAME_MAANA-ani
+N+Prop+Ani: SNAME_MAANA ;

LEXICON SNAME_MAANA-plc
+N+Prop+Plc: SNAME_MAANA_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON SNAME_MAANA-org
+N+Prop+Org: SNAME_MAANA_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON SNAME_MAANA-obj
+N+Prop+Obj: SNAME_MAANA ;

LEXICON SNAME_MAANA ! as MAANA, but with Prop tag
+Sg: MAANASGNOM ;
+Sg+Acc:a%>m       FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Gen:a%>n       FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Ill:e%>se      FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Ine:e%>sne     FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Ela:e%>ste     FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Com:%>ine      FINAL1 ;
:a          RHyph ;
+Pl: MAANA_PL ;
 EVEN_ESS ;
+Attr:a FINAL1 ;

LEXICON SNAME_MAANA_PLC-ORG ! as MAANA, but with Prop tag
+Sg: MAANASGNOM ;
+Sg+Acc:a%>m       FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Gen:a%>n       FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Ill:e%>se      FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Ine:e%>sne     FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Ela:e%>ste     FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Com:%>ine      FINAL1 ;
:a          RHyph ;
!+Pl: MAANA_PL ;
 EVEN_ESS ;
+Attr:a FINAL1 ;

LEXICON SNAME_MAANA-LOAN ! as MAANA, but with Prop tag
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Nom:a          FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Use/Sub:%>eme FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Use/Sub:%>edh FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Use/Sub:e%>se FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Acc:a%>m       FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Acc+PxSg1+Use/Sub:%>eme FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Acc+PxSg1+Use/NG+Use/Sub:%>emem FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Acc+PxSg2+Use/Sub:%>emdh FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Acc+PxSg3+Use/Sub:e%>mse FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen:a%>n       FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen+PxSg1+Use/Sub:%>ene FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Ill:e%>se      FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Ill+PxSg1+Use/Sub:%>asanne FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Ill+PxSg2+Use/Sub:%>asadth FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Ine:e%>sne     FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Ela:e%>ste     FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Ela+PxSg1+Use/Sub:%>astanne FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Ela+PxSg1+Use/NG+Use/Sub:%>astadth FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Com:%>ine      FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Com+PxSg2+Use/Sub:%>anadth FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Plc:a          RHyph ;
! +N+Prop+Plc+Pl: MAANA_PL ;
 +N+Prop+Plc: EVEN_ESS ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Attr:a FINAL1 ;


LEXICON SNAME_MAANA_PLUR ! as MAANA, but with Prop tag
+N+Prop+Plc+Pl: MAANA_PL ;
+N+Prop+Plc:a%>j       RHyph ;
+N+Prop+Plc:    EVEN_ESS ;
!+N+Prop+Plc+Attr:a%>h FINAL1 ;

LEXICON JÆLLAN ! as MAANA, but with Prop tag
+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Nom:a%>n       FINAL1 ;
+N+Prop+Plc:a%>n       RHyph ;
+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Acc:a%>m       FINAL1 ;
+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen:a%>n       FINAL1 ;
+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Ill:e%>se      FINAL1 ;
+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Ine:e%>sne     FINAL1 ;
+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Ela:e%>ste     FINAL1 ;
+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Com:%>ine      FINAL1 ;
!+N+Prop+Plc+Pl: MAANA_PL ;
+N+Prop+Plc:    EVEN_ESS ;
+N+Prop+Plc+Attr:a%>n FINAL1 ;

LEXICON PERS_SNAME_NIEJTE-mal
+N+Prop+Mal: PERS_SNAME_NIEJTE ;
+N+Prop+Mal+Der1+Der/Dimin+N:e%»tj   GÅATETJE ; !Åvletje

LEXICON PERS_SNAME_NIEJTE-fem
+N+Prop+Fem: PERS_SNAME_NIEJTE ;
+N+Prop+Fem+Der1+Der/Dimin+N:e%»tj   GÅATETJE ; !Åvletje

LEXICON PERS_SNAME_NIEJTE-ani
+N+Prop+Ani: PERS_SNAME_NIEJTE ;

LEXICON PERS_SNAME_NIEJTE
 SNAME_NIEJTE ;


LEXICON SNAME_NIEJTE-plc
+N+Prop+Plc: SNAME_NIEJTE_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON SNAME_NIEJTE-ani
+N+Prop+Ani: SNAME_NIEJTE ;

LEXICON SNAME_NIEJTE-mal
+N+Prop+Mal: SNAME_NIEJTE ;

LEXICON SNAME_NIEJTE-fem
+N+Prop+Fem: SNAME_NIEJTE ;

LEXICON SNAME_NIEJTE-sur
+N+Prop+Sur: SNAME_NIEJTE ;

LEXICON SNAME_NIEJTE-org
+N+Prop+Org: SNAME_NIEJTE_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON SNAME_NIEJTE-obj
+N+Prop+Obj: SNAME_NIEJTE ;


LEXICON SNAME_NIEJTE ! as NIEJTE, but with Prop tag
+Sg:    NIEJTE_SG ;
+Pl:    NIEJTE_PL ;
        EVEN_ESS ;
+Attr:e FINAL1 ;
        NIEJTE_CMPND ;
        
LEXICON SNAME_NIEJTE_PLC-ORG ! as NIEJTE, but with Prop tag
+Sg:    NIEJTE_SG ;
!+Pl:    NIEJTE_PL ;
        EVEN_ESS ;
+Attr:e FINAL1 ;
        NIEJTE_CMPND ;


LEXICON SNAME_NIEJTE-LOAN-plc
SNAME_NIEJTE-LOAN ; ! To be fixed

LEXICON SNAME_NIEJTE-LOAN ! as NIEJTE, but with Prop tag
  +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Nom:e          FINAL1 ;
  +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Use/Sub:%>eme FINAL1 ;
  +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Use/Sub:%>edh FINAL1 ;
  +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Use/Sub:e%>se FINAL1 ;
  +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Acc:e%>m       FINAL1 ;
  +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Acc+PxSg1+Use/Sub:%>eme FINAL1 ;
  +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Acc+PxSg1+Use/NG+Use/Sub:%>emem FINAL1 ;
  +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Acc+PxSg2+Use/Sub:%>emdh FINAL1 ;
  +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Acc+PxSg3+Use/Sub:e%>mse FINAL1 ;
  +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen:e%>n       FINAL1 ;
  +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen+PxSg1+Use/Sub:%>ene FINAL1 ;
  +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Ill:e%>se      FINAL1 ;
  +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Ill+PxSg1+Use/Sub:%>esanne FINAL1 ;
  +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Ill+PxSg2+Use/Sub:%>esadth FINAL1 ;
  +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Ine:e%>sne     FINAL1 ;
  +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Ela:e%>ste     FINAL1 ;
  +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Ela+PxSg1+Use/Sub:%>estanne FINAL1 ;
  +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Ela+PxSg1+Use/NG+Use/Sub:%>estadth FINAL1 ;
  +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Com:%>ine      FINAL1 ;
  +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Com+PxSg2+Use/Sub:%>enadth FINAL1 ;
  +N+Prop+Plc:e          RHyph ;
!  +N+Prop+Plc+Pl: NIEJTE_PL ;
  +N+Prop+Plc:    EVEN_ESS ;
  +N+Prop+Plc+Attr:e FINAL1 ;
